Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 20 Ditches and Drains

46-20-1.
Petition to drain across lands of another.

Whenever the owner or owners of any lands in this state may wish to drain the lands, and cannot agree with the proprietor or proprietors of the adjacent land or lands to be affected, as to the mode of draining the land or lands and the damages consequent thereon, the owner or owners may prefer a petition to the town council of the town in which the lands are situated, for power to drain the land or lands across the lands of other proprietors. The petition shall set forth the course of the proposed ditch or drain, and the names of the proprietors whose lands are to be affected thereby, and the petitioner shall file a bond in such sum as the town council shall direct, conditioned to pay all costs of the proceedings in case it shall be determined inexpedient to construct the ditch or drain.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 76, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 90, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 102, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 350, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-20-1

.

46-20-2.
Notice of hearing on petition.

On receipt of the petition as aforesaid, the town council shall refer the matter to some day for a hearing, and shall cause notice to be served on all parties interested, of the substance of the petition and the time and place of the hearing thereon, at least twenty (20) days before the hearing. In case any parties interested are not residents of the state, notice shall be given by sending the citation by mail to their last known place of abode, and by publishing a notice of the pendency of the petition, in some newspaper published in the county, for three (3) weeks before the time appointed for the hearing.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 76, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 90, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 102, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 350, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

46-20-2

.

46-20-3.
Determination of best method of drainage — Apportionment of damages — Action by council.

If the town council, after hearing the parties in interest, shall deem it advisable, they shall appoint three (3) judicious and disinterested persons who shall prescribe the best mode of draining the land or lands and shall apportion the damages and benefits between the parties in interest, and shall make a report in writing of their doings to the council, and the council shall appoint a day for hearing the parties interested, and, after notice as provided in §

46-20-2

, shall consider the report, and accept or reject the report in whole or in part, as justice shall require, and the council may make such orders thereon as they shall deem lawful and right.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 76, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 90, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 102, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 350, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

46-20-3

.

46-20-4.
Appeal.

If either of the parties interested shall be aggrieved by the doings or orders of the town council, that party, or that party’s heir or devisee, may appeal therefrom, according to the provisions of law, with reference to appeals from town councils.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 76, § 4; C.P.A. 1905, § 1106; G.L. 1909, ch. 90, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 102, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 350, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

46-20-4

.

46-20-5.
Costs.

The costs of the petition and all the proceedings thereon under this chapter shall be taxed at the discretion of the town council or of the court, and execution shall issue therefor as in civil cases.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 76, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 90, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 102, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 350, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

46-20-5

.